Maryland, session 2025, HB0577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
(a) The Comptroller, in consultation with stakeholders, shall study the process by
which the Field Enforcement Bureau of the Comptroller’s Office enforces miscellaneous
State business licenses under Title 17 of the Business Regulation Article.
(b) The Comptroller shall consult with, at a minimum, the following stakeholders:
(1) the Alcohol, Tobacco, and Cannabis Commission;
(2) the Maryland Chamber of Commerce;
(3) the Maryland Retailers Alliance;
(4) the Maryland Restaurant Association;
(5) the Job Opportunities Task Force; and
(6) the Maryland Circuit Court Clerks’ Association.
– 1 –

Ch. 633 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) On or before December 1, 2025, the Comptroller shall submit a report of its
findings and recommendations to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, including:
(1) a review of the process by which the Field Enforcement Bureau of the
Comptroller’s Office enforces the miscellaneous State business licenses;
(2) a review and recommendation as to whether civil citations could be used
rather than or in conjunction with criminal citations to enforce the miscellaneous State
business licenses;
(3) recommendations on how to ensure that the Field Enforcement Bureau
can, for the purposes of license enforcement, properly identify and contact the owner,
operator, or responsible party for a miscellaneous State business license;
(4) recommendations on how to ensure citations related to miscellaneous
State business license enforcement are only issued to the business owner, operator, or
responsible party; and
(5) recommendations on how the Field Enforcement Bureau can effectively
issue citations related to miscellaneous State business license enforcement when the
business owner does not reside in the State.
Article – Business Regulation
17–202.
(d) To enforce this title, the Comptroller may make investigations and hold
hearings on any matter covered by this title, at any time or place in the State, and, in
connection with an investigation or hearing, may:
(1) administer oaths;
(2) examine witnesses;
(3) receive evidence; [and]
(4) issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses to testify or to produce
evidence; AND
(5) ISSUE CITATIONS.
17–302.
(f) Each application for a license shall:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 633
(1) DESIGNATE AT LEAST ONE INDIVIDUAL TO SERVE AS THE LICENSE
REPRESENTATIVE WHO:
(I) IS A RESIDENT OF THE STATE;
(II) IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE BUSINESS FOR THE PURPOSE
OF BEING SUBJECT TO THE PENALTIES FOR A VIOLATION OF SUBTITLE 21 OF THIS
TITLE; AND
(III) HAS ACCEPTED THE RESPONSIBILITY UNDER ITEM (II) OF
THIS ITEM;
(2) PROVIDE THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND CONTACT INFORMATION FOR
THE LICENSE REPRESENTATIVE; AND
(3) contain any information required by the Comptroller in regulation.
17–2106.
(a) THE PENALTIES FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE APPLY TO THE
FOLLOWING PERSONS:
(1) A PERSON SPECIFIED AS THE BUSINESS OWNER IN THE LICENSE
APPLICATION;
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL DESIGNATED AS A LICENSE REPRESENTATIVE
UNDER § 17–302(F)(1) OF THIS TITLE;
(3) FOR A CORPORATION, THE CORPORATION OR ONE OR MORE
OFFICERS OF THE CORPORATION;
(4) FOR A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY:
(I) IF THE COMPANY DOES NOT HAVE AN OPERATING
AGREEMENT, ONE OR MORE MEMBERS; OR
(II) IF THE COMPANY HAS AN OPERATING AGREEMENT, ONE OR
MORE INDIVIDUALS WHO MANAGE THE BUSINESS AND AFFAIRS OF THE COMPANY;
(5) FOR A LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIP:
(I) IF THE PARTNERSHIP DOES NOT HAVE A WRITTEN
PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT, ONE OR MORE GENERAL PARTNERS; OR
– 3 –

Ch. 633 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) IF THE PARTNERSHIP HAS A WRITTEN PARTNERSHIP
AGREEMENT, ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS WHO MANAGE THE BUSINESS AND
AFFAIRS OF THE PARTNERSHIP; AND
(6) FOR A BUSINESS ENTITY NOT IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEMS (3)
THROUGH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS WHO MANAGE THE
BUSINESS AND AFFAIRS OF THE ENTITY.
(B) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this title, a person who violates
this subtitle is guilty of a misdemeanor and, on conviction, is subject to a fine not exceeding
$300 or imprisonment not exceeding 30 days.
[(b)] (C) Each [agent or officer of a corporation] PERSON WHO IS convicted of
violating this subtitle [who actually engaged in the unlicensed business is] MAY BE
individually subject to the penalties provided by law.
[(c)] (D) The penalty provided in this section does not affect any other penalty
specifically provided by law for a violation of a license law.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October July 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –